Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.285

Group homes or halfway houses for released juveniles or developmentally disabled.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Housing authorities created under this chapter may establish and operate group homes or halfway houses to serve juveniles released from state juvenile or correctional institutions, or to serve the developmentally disabled as defined in *RCW 71A.10.020(2). Authorities may contract for the operation of facilities so established, with qualified nonprofit organizations as agent of the authority. Authorities may provide support or supportive services in facilities serving juveniles, the developmentally disabled or other persons under a disability, and the frail elderly, whether or not they are operated by the authority.

Action under this section shall be taken by the authority only after a public hearing as provided by chapter 42.30 RCW. In exercising this power the authority shall not be empowered to acquire property by eminent domain, and the facilities established shall comply with all zoning, building, fire, and health regulations and procedures applicable in the locality.

[1991 c 167 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 198 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 71A.10.020 was amended by 1998 c 216 s 2, changing subsection (2) to subsection (3). RCW 71A.10.020 was subsequently amended by 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 3, changing subsection (3) to subsection (4). RCW 71A.10.020 was subsequently amended by 2014 c 139 s 2, changing subsection (4) to subsection (5). RCW 71A.10.020 was subsequently amended by 2022 c 277 s 2, changing subsection (5) to subsection (6).

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 198: See note following RCW 13.06.050.